Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-2-402, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 8, O.S.L. 2023 (10A O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2-2-402), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-2-402. A. All cases of children shall be heard


separately from the trial of cases against adults. The adjudicative


hearings shall be conducted according to the rules of evidence, and


may be adjourned from time to time.


1. Except as provided by paragraph 2 of this subsection, the


hearings shall be private; however, all persons having a direct


interest in the case as provided in this paragraph shall be admitted


and such proceedings may be made public if it is in the public

Req. No. 3124 Page 1


interest. Any victim, relative, legal guardian of a victim, or a


person designated by the victim who is not subject to the rule of


sequestration as a witness of a delinquent act shall be considered


to have a direct interest in the case, shall be notified of all


court hearings involving that particular delinquent act, and shall


be admitted to the proceedings. The court shall, however, remove


all persons not having a direct interest in the case or that are not


the parents or legal guardian of the child from any hearing where


evidence of the medical or behavioral health condition of the child


or specific instances of deprivation are being presented.


Stenographic notes or other transcript of the hearings shall be kept


as in other cases, but they shall not be open to inspection except


by order of the court or as otherwise provided by law.


2. Hearings related to the second or subsequent delinquency


adjudication of a child shall be public proceedings. The


adjudications relied upon to determine whether a hearing is a public


proceeding pursuant to this paragraph shall not have arisen out of


the same transaction or occurrence or series of events closely


related in time and location. Upon its own motion or the motion of


any of the parties to the hearing and for good cause shown, the


court may order specific testimony or evidence to be heard in


private; provided, the court shall not exclude any relative, legal


guardian of a victim, or a person designated by the victim who is


not subject to the rule of sequestration as a witness from the

Req. No. 3124 Page 2


hearing during testimony of the victim. For the purposes of this


paragraph, “good cause” shall mean a showing that it would be


substantially harmful to the mental or physical well-being of the


child if such testimony or evidence were presented at a public


hearing. The judge may, for good cause shown, open the court


hearings to educate members of the public about juvenile justice


issues; however, the identities of the juvenile respondents shall


not be published in any reports or articles of general circulation.


B. The child may remain silent as a matter of right in


delinquency hearings and in need of supervision hearings, and before


the child testifies, the child shall be so advised.


C. A decision determining a child to come within the purview of


the Oklahoma Juvenile Code shall be based on sworn testimony and the


child shall have the opportunity for cross-examination unless the


facts are stipulated or unless the child enters into a stipulation


that the allegations of the petition are true or that sufficient


evidence exists to meet the burden of proof required for the court


to sustain the allegations of the petition. In proceedings pursuant


to the Oklahoma Juvenile Code, the court may allow mileage as in


civil actions to witnesses and reimbursement for expert witnesses


but such shall not be tendered in advance of the hearing. If a


child is alleged to be delinquent and the facts are stipulated, the


judge shall ascertain from the child if the child agrees with the



Req. No. 3124 Page 3


stipulation and if the child understands the consequences of


stipulating the facts.


D. For any child being held in a secure detention on charges as


an accused juvenile delinquent, adjudication shall occur within


thirty (30) days after the detainment for that charge. This time


may be extended to allow parties to negotiate in good faith to


review discovery or for any other good cause shown. The provisions


of this subsection shall not apply to matters in which a non-jury or


jury trial are requested by the child.


E. If the court finds that the allegations of a petition


alleging a child to be delinquent or in need of supervision are


supported by the evidence, the court shall sustain the petition, and


shall make an order of adjudication setting forth whether the child


is delinquent or in need of supervision and shall adjudge the child


as a ward of the court.


F. If the court finds that the allegations of the petition are


not supported by the evidence, the court shall order the petition


dismissed and shall order the child discharged from any detention or


restriction previously ordered. The parents, legal guardian or


other legal custodian of the child shall also be discharged from any


restriction or other previous temporary order.


G. Any arrest or detention under the Oklahoma Juvenile Code or


any adjudication in a juvenile proceeding shall not be considered an


arrest, detention or conviction for purposes of employment, civil

Req. No. 3124 Page 4


rights, or any statute, regulation, license, questionnaire,


application, or any other public or private purposes, unless


otherwise provided by law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3124 BLB 1/15/2026 8:20:44 AM





































Req. No. 3124 Page 5